zh-CN: 适用的动力装置类型: CO2; 电动 (AEG); 气动/气弹簧; 预充气动 (PCP); 泵动气压; 弹簧活塞; 其他
es: Tipo de planta motriz compatible: CO2; Eléctrica (AEG); Pistón de gas/resorte de gas; Neumática precargada (PCP); Neumática de bombeo; Pistón de resorte; Otro
zh-TW: 相容動力系統類型: CO2; 電動 (AEG); 氣體活塞/氣彈簧; 預充氣動 (PCP); 泵動氣動; 彈簧活塞; 其他
it: Tipo di motore compatibile: CO2; Elettrica (AEG); Gas ram/molla a gas; Aria precompressa (PCP); Pompa pneumatica; Molla-pistone; Altro
tr: Uyumlu güç kaynağı tipi: CO2; Elektrikli (AEG); Gazlı piston/gazlı yay; Önceden doldurulmuş pnömatik (PCP); Pompalı pnömatik; Yaylı piston; Diğer
el: Συμβατός τύπος κινητήρα: CO2; Ηλεκτρικό (AEG); Αερίου/ελατηρίου αερίου; Προσυμπιεσμένου αέρα (PCP); Αντλίας αέρα; Ελατηρίου-πιστονιού; Άλλο
ru: Совместимый тип силовой установки: CO2; Электрическая (AEG); Газовая пружина; Пневматика с предварительной накачкой (PCP); Мультикомпрессионная пневматика; Пружинно-поршневая; Другое
bg-BG: Съвместим тип задвижващ двигател: CO2; Електрическо (AEG); Газово бутало/газова пружина; Пневматика с предварително напомпване (PCP); Пневматика с помпане; Пружинно-бутално; Друго
da: Kompatibel strømkildetype: CO2; Elektrisk (AEG); Gasfjeder; Pre-charged pneumatic (PCP); Pumpe (pneumatisk); Fjeder-stempel; Andet
nl: Compatibel aandrijvingstype: CO2; Elektrisch (AEG); Gasram/gasveer; Perslucht (PCP); Pomp-pneumatisch; Veerzuiger; Overig
nb: Kompatibel kraftverkstype: CO2; Elektrisk (AEG); Gassfjær; Ferdigladet pneumatisk (PCP); Pumpepneumatisk; Fjær/stempel; Annet
hu: Kompatibilis hajtóműtípus: CO2; Elektromos (AEG); Gázrugós; Elősűrített levegős (PCP); Pumpás (pneumatikus); Rugós-dugattyús; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ kompatibilného pohonu: CO2; Elektrický (AEG); Plynový piest/plynová pružina; Predhustená pneumatická (PCP); Pumpovacia pneumatická; Pružina-piest; Iné
fi: Yhteensopiva voimanlähdetyyppi: CO2; Sähkö (AEG); Kaasumäntä / kaasujousi; Paineilma (PCP); Pumpputoiminen (pneumaattinen); Jousimäntä; Muu
fr: Type de motorisation compatible: CO2; Électrique (AEG); Piston à gaz/vérin à gaz; Pneumatique pré-chargé (PCP); Pneumatique à pompe; Piston à ressort; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip pogonskog agregata: CO2; Električni (AEG); Plinski klip / plinska opruga; Stlačeni zrak (PCP); Pumpa - zračna; Opruga - klip; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de central compatível: CO2; Elétrica (AEG); Pistão a gás/mola a gás; Ar pré-comprimido (PCP); Bomba pneumática; Pistão de mola; Outro
vi: Loại hệ thống động cơ tương thích: CO2; Chạy bằng điện (AEG); Piston khí nén (Gas ram/gas spring); Khí nén nạp trước (PCP); Khí nén kiểu bơm; Piston lò xo; Khác
pl: Kompatybilny typ napędu: CO2; Elektryczny (AEG); Sprężyna gazowa; Powietrze sprężone (PCP); Pompka pneumatyczna; Sprężynowo-tłokowy; Inne
lt-LT: Suderinamas jėgainės tipas: CO2; Elektrinis (AEG); Dujinė spyruoklė; Iš anksto pripildomas pneumatinis (PCP); Pompinis pneumatinis; Spyruoklinis-stūmoklinis; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de acționare compatibil: CO2; Electrică (AEG); Piston cu gaz / arc cu gaz; Pneumatică preîncărcată (PCP); Pneumatică cu pompă; Piston cu arc; Altele
th: ประเภทโรงไฟฟ้าที่เข้ากันได้: CO2; ไฟฟ้า (AEG); สปริงแก๊ส/ลูกสูบแก๊ส; PCP; ปั๊มลม; ลูกสูบสปริง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema de propulsão compatível: CO2; Elétrica (AEG); Gás ram/mola a gás; Pneumática pré-carregada (PCP); Bomba pneumática; Mola-pistão; Outro
sv: Kompatibel kraftverkstyp: CO2; Elektrisk (AEG); Gaskolv/gasfjäder; Förkomprimerad luft (PCP); Pump (pneumatisk); Fjäderdriven; Övrigt
en: Compatible powerplant type: CO2; Electric (AEG); Gas ram/gas spring; Pre-charged pneumatic (PCP); Pump pneumatic; Spring-piston; Other
de: Kompatibler Antriebstyp: CO2; Elektrisch (AEG); Gaskolben/Gasdruckfeder; Pressluft (PCP); Pump-Pneumatik; Federdruck; Sonstige
ja: 互換性のある発電所タイプ: CO2; 電動 (AEG); ガスラム/ガススプリング; プレチャージ式 (PCP); ポンプ式; スプリングピストン; その他
ko: 호환되는 발전소 유형: CO2; 전동(AEG); 가스 램/가스 스프링; 사전 압축 공기식(PCP); 펌프 공기식; 스프링 피스톤; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiv tip pogonskega sistema: CO2; Električno (AEG); Plinski bat/plinska vzmet; Prednapolnjena pnevmatika (PCP); Pnevmatika na črpalko; Vzmetni bat; Drugo
cs: Kompatibilní typ pohonné jednotky: CO2; Elektrické (AEG); Plynový píst / plynová pružina; Větrovky (PCP); Čerpací (pneumatické); Pružina-píst; Jiné